Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 5 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY LAW
43-4-507. Local improvement districts.

The board may establish local improvement districts within the boundaries of the authority to facilitate the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of public highways within or without the boundaries of the authority. Such local improvement districts may be established by the board whenever any area within the boundaries of the authority, in the opinion of the board, will be especially benefited by the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of such public highway. No local improvement district shall be established by the board unless it receives a petition signed by the owners of property which will bear a majority of the proposed assessments and by a petition signed by the lesser of a majority of the registered electorate in the proposed district or one thousand registered electors in the proposed district. The method of creating local improvement districts, making the improvements, and assessing the costs thereof shall be as provided in part 6 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S.; except that the board shall perform the duties of the board of county commissioners thereunder and the improvements shall be public highways as defined by section 43-4-503 (12).

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1850, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-508. Value capture areas.

The board may establish one or more value capture areas within its boundaries to facilitate the financing and construction, operation, or maintenance of public highways within or without the boundaries of the authority. Such value capture areas may be established by the board whenever the market value of any area within the boundaries of the authority, in the opinion of the board, will increase as a result of the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway.

Prior to the creation of a value capture area, the board shall prepare a value capture plan which shall identify the public highway to be financed, constructed, operated, or maintained, the property to be included in the value capture area, the period of time which the value capture area shall be in effect, and the portion of the property taxes or sales taxes levied or collected within the value capture area which will be retained by the authority during the period the value capture area remains in effect. A copy of the value capture plan shall be submitted to the division, the department of revenue, and the governing body of each governmental unit which has the power to levy or impose a property tax or sales tax within the boundaries of the proposed value capture area. Not less than twenty days prior to the hearing on the value capture plan, notice of the time and place of the hearing on the value capture plan shall be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed value capture area and shall be mailed to the division and the governmental units which receive the value capture plan.

The board shall hold a hearing which shall be open to the public, and a record of the proceedings shall be made. All governmental units who receive notice of the hearing as set forth in subsection (2) of this section and each owner of property within the proposed value capture area shall be interested parties and shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard. Following the hearing, the board may approve or disapprove the value capture plan. After approval, any such value capture plan may be modified in substantially the same manner as the original approval.

Any such value capture plan as originally adopted or later modified may contain a provision that property taxes, if any, levied or imposed by a governmental unit after the effective date of the value capture plan upon taxable property within the value capture area or that any sales taxes collected within said area after the effective date of the value capture plan, or all such taxes, shall be divided for a period set forth in the value capture plan after the effective date of the value capture plan, as follows:

That portion of the property taxes which are produced by the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each governmental unit upon the valuation for assessment of taxable property within the boundaries of the value capture area last certified prior to the effective date of the value capture plan, or that portion of the sales tax collected within the boundaries of the value capture area in the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the month prior to the effective date of the value capture plan, or both such portions shall be paid into the funds of each such governmental unit as are all other taxes collected by or for said governmental unit.

Twenty-five percent, or such different amounts as may be agreed to by each affected governmental unit, of the amount of said property taxes or sales taxes, or both, which is in excess of the portion determined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be allocated and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the authority for the payment of, or the funding of reserves, sinking, or other funds for the payment of, the principal of, interest on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of the authority incurred for the financing of a public highway. The balance, if any, of such excess shall be paid into the funds of each such governmental unit as are all other taxes collected by or for said governmental unit.

In the event that there is a general reassessment of taxable property in any county, including all or part of a value capture area, or a change in the rate of the sales tax collected by a county or municipality in a value capture area, the portions of taxes specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be proportionately adjusted in accordance with such reassessment or change.

When such bonds of the authority, including refunding bonds, have been paid, all taxes in such value capture area shall thereafter be paid into the funds of the respective governmental units.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1850, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-509. Bonds.

The authority may, from time to time, issue bonds for any of its corporate purposes. The bonds shall be issued pursuant to resolution of the board and shall be payable solely out of all or a specified portion of the revenues as designated by the board.

Bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at such times, may be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities, may be subject to optional or mandatory redemption prior to maturity with or without a premium, may be in fully registered form or bearer form registrable as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges, may be payable in such installments and at such times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state, may bear interest at such rate or rates per annum, which may be fixed or vary according to index, procedure, or formula or as determined by the authority or its agents, without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of the state, may be subject to purchase at the option of the holder or the authority, may be evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which may be either of an officer of the authority or of an agent authenticating the same, may be in the form of coupon bonds which have attached interest coupons bearing a manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the authority, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this part 5, all as provided in the resolution of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as provided in a trust indenture between the authority and any commercial bank or trust company having full trust powers.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as determined by the board, and the board may pay all fees, expenses, and commissions which it deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the sale of the bonds. The power to fix the date of sale of the bonds, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds, to fix interest rates, and to take all other action necessary to sell and deliver the bonds may be delegated to an officer or agent of the authority. Any outstanding bonds may be refunded by the authority pursuant to article 56 of title 11, C.R.S. All bonds and any interest coupons applicable thereto are declared to be negotiable instruments.

The resolution or trust indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds may pledge all or a portion of the revenues of the authority, may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of holders of any of the bonds as the authority deems appropriate, may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds, and may contain provisions which the authority deems appropriate for the security of the holders of the bonds, including but not limited to provisions for letters of credit, insurance, standby credit agreements, or other forms of credit insuring timely payment of the bonds, including the redemption price or the purchase price.

Any pledge of revenues or property made by the authority or by any person or governmental unit with which the authority contracts shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues or property so pledged shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the pledging party, irrespective of whether such claiming party has notice of such lien. The instrument by which the pledge is created need not be recorded or filed.

Neither the members of the board, employees of the authority, nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

The authority may purchase its bonds out of any available funds and may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with the holders thereof.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1851, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-510. Cooperative powers.

The authority has the power to cooperate with any person:

To accept contributions, loans, or advances from any person with respect to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway and in connection with any loan or advance to enter into contracts establishing the repayment terms;

To enter into contracts with respect to and to cooperate in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a specified public highway;

To enter into joint operating contracts concerning a public highway;

To cooperate in acquiring easements or rights-of-way for a public highway;

To transfer dominion over all or any portion of a public highway financed, operated, maintained, or constructed by the authority to the federal government, the state, other governmental units, or any person; and

To designate a public highway as part of the federal highway system, the state highway system, a county highway system, or a municipal highway system if the person with jurisdiction over such highway system consents to such designation.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1853, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-511. Powers of governmental units.

A governmental unit, for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any public highway, has the power:

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, and otherwise dispose to the authority any real or personal property or interests therein;

To enter into agreements with any person for the joint financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any public highway. Upon compliance with applicable constitutional or charter limitations, such governmental unit may agree to make payments without limitation as to amount except as set forth in the agreement, from revenues from one or more fiscal years, to the authority or any person to defray the costs of the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway.

To transfer or assign to the authority any contracts which may have been awarded by the governmental unit for construction, operation, or maintenance of any public highway.

To assist in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway, any county or municipality which is a member of a combination may, by contract, pledge to the authority all or a portion of the revenues it receives from the highway users tax fund. The authority shall apply revenues which it receives pursuant to such pledge to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of public highways.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1853, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-512. Referendum.

No action by an authority to establish or increase any annual motor vehicle registration fee authorized by this part 5 shall take effect unless first submitted to a vote of the registered electors of that portion of the combination in which the fee is proposed to be collected at a general election, or a special election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February, May, October, or December. Such action shall not take effect unless a majority of the registered electors voting thereon at the election vote in favor thereof. The election shall be conducted in substantially the same manner as county elections, and the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the election is conducted shall assist the authority in conducting the election. The authority shall pay the costs incurred by each county in conducting such an election. No moneys of the authority may be used to urge or oppose passage of an election to establish or increase any annual motor vehicle registration fee authorized by this part 5.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1854, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 37, § 4, effective March 18.

43-4-513. Notice - opportunity for comment.

The board of any authority created pursuant to this part 5, at least forty-five days prior to any meeting at which the board shall consider or take action on a proposal to establish, increase, or decrease any fee authorized by this part 5, shall deliver written notice of the meeting and proposal to any municipality where the proposed fee would be imposed. Prior to the taking of any action on such proposal by the board of any authority, municipalities entitled to receive notice pursuant to this section shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity for comment, either at a regular meeting of the board of the authority or at a special meeting convened to receive such comment.

The board of any authority created pursuant to this part 5, at least seven business days prior to any regularly scheduled meeting, shall make available to the public written or electronic notice of the time and agenda of such meeting. The board shall designate during each meeting a public comment period that shall be at least one hour in duration and shall offer the public an opportunity to comment during such period. Such period may be abridged when the public is finished offering comments.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1854, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 37, § 5, effective March 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 401, § 1, effective August 7.

43-4-514. Notice - coordination of information - report.

At least forty-five days prior to the creation of any authority or value capture area pursuant to this part 5, a notice containing the proposed boundaries of the authority or value capture area and the methods proposed for financing public highways in the authority or a copy of the value capture plan shall be sent to the division and to the department of revenue.

At least forty-five days prior to the imposition of or any increase in any fee or prior to the issuance of any bonds authorized in this part 5, a notice specifying the amount of the fee and its proposed duration or the value and number of bonds to be issued shall be sent to the division. The notice required by this paragraph (b) shall not be necessary if the required information has previously been provided in the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

At the time the notice required in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (1) is sent to the division, a copy shall be filed with the transportation legislation review committee.

The division shall forward copies of any such notice to the department of transportation if it determines that the proposed authority or value capture area or the fee or bonds will have an impact on any operations of that department.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2017.)

The division shall notify the general assembly by letter, if it deems that immediate notification is warranted, of any situation relating to the creation of an authority or value capture area, the imposition of any fee, or the issuance of any bonds by an authority that the division believes or has reason to believe will adversely affect the tax-raising ability or the credit or bond rating of any governmental unit or any school district.

Notwithstanding the requirements of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the authority shall report annually in the month of August to the transportation legislation review committee on its activities during the preceding twelve months and on its proposed activities during the succeeding twelve months. The board and staff of the authority shall cooperate with the transportation legislation review committee in carrying out its duties pursuant to section 43-2-145 (1.5).

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1854, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1134, § 220, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 622, § 5, effective April 14.

L. 96:

(1)(b), (2), and (3)(b) amended, p. 37, § 6, effective March 18.

L. 2002:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (3) amended, p. 874, § 14, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(3) and (4) amended, (HB 17-1047), ch. 26, p. 79, § 5, effective August 9.

43-4-515. Successor to prior entity - assumption of obligations and liabilities - action for mandamus or injunctive relief.

An authority, if the contract establishing it so provides, shall be the successor to any nonprofit corporation, agency, or other entity theretofore organized to provide public highways, shall be entitled to all rights and privileges, and shall assume all obligations and liabilities of such other entity under existing contracts to which such entity is a party. An authority and a county or municipality which is a member of the combination may enter into a contract by which the county or municipality assigns its liabilities and obligations, and the authority assumes such liabilities and obligations, under any contract, resolution, ordinance, or other public act which the county or municipality has entered into or adopted with respect to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a public highway, including bonds which it has issued.

A county or municipality that has issued bonds to finance a public highway prior to the creation of an authority and that has lent all or a portion of the proceeds of such bonds to such authority shall not take any action or fail to take any action that would limit the availability of the proceeds of such bonds to the authority or adversely affect the ability of the authority to finance the public highway unless the authority consents or unless such action or failure to act is required by the agreements with the holders of the bonds. If a county or municipality has assigned to an authority its rights and privileges regarding bonds issued to finance a public highway, such county or municipality shall take any action requested by the authority in connection with such bonds and the documents governing such bonds. A county or municipality which has assigned to an authority all of its rights and privileges regarding bonds issued by the county to finance a public highway shall not have any financial liability with respect to the repayment of such bonds except to the extent expressly provided in the bonds or the assignment. The assumption of obligations and liabilities by an authority pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be the creation of any new debt or obligation for the purposes of the constitution or laws of the state.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section may be enforced by the authority filing an action for mandamus or injunctive relief with the district court. The district court shall enter an order within thirty days after the filing of any such action.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1855, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 960, § 2, effective June 1.

43-4-516. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights of obligees.

The state hereby pledges and agrees with the holders of any bonds issued under this part 5 and with those parties who enter into contracts with the authority or any member of the combination pursuant to this part 5 that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in the authority or the rights or obligations of any person with which it contracts to fulfill the terms of any agreements made pursuant to this part 5. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any bonds of the authority until such bonds have been paid or until adequate provision for payment has been made. The authority may include this provision and undertaking for the state in such bonds.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1855, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-517. Investments.

The authority may invest or deposit any funds in the manner provided by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. In addition, the authority may direct a corporate trustee which holds funds of the authority to invest or deposit such funds in investments or deposits other than those specified by said part 6 if the board determines, by resolution, that such investment or deposit meets the standard established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., the income is at least comparable to income available on investments or deposits specified by said part 6, and such investment will assist the authority in the financing, construction, maintenance, or operation of public highways.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1855, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1127, § 58, effective July 1.

43-4-518. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any moneys within their control in any bonds issued under this part 5. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1856, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1134, § 81, effective July 1.

43-4-519. Exemption from taxation - securities laws.

The income or other revenues of the authority, all properties at any time owned by the authority, any bonds issued by the authority, and the transfer of and the income from any bonds issued by the authority shall be exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state. In the resolution or indenture authorizing the bonds, the authority may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on the bonds. Bonds issued by the authority shall be exempt from the provisions of article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1856, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-520. No action maintainable.

An action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to review any acts or proceedings, or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act or proceedings or the issuance of any bonds, or for any other relief against or from any acts or proceedings done under this part 5, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall not be maintained, unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or proceedings or the effective date thereof, and shall be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1856, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-521. Termination of revenue-raising powers.

When all bonds and obligations of an authority have been paid in full and the authority has established a maintenance trust fund sufficient to meet future needs of the authority, all revenue-raising powers granted pursuant to this part 5, including tolls, shall terminate.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part added, p. 1856, § 1, effective August 27.

43-4-522. Judicial examination of powers, acts, proceedings, or contracts of an authority.

In its discretion, the board of an authority may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the authority is located wholly or in part praying for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred to the authority, any revenue-raising power exercised or to be exercised by the authority, or any act, proceeding, or contract of the authority, whether or not such contract has been executed. Such judicial examination and determination shall be conducted in substantially the manner set forth in section 32-4-540, C.R.S.; except that the notice required shall be published once a week for three consecutive weeks and the hearing shall be held not less than thirty days nor more than forty days after the filing of the petition.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 962, § 3, effective June 1.